Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 1 Department of Veterans Service

Cross references.

Veterans Service Board, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. V, Para. I.

38-4-1.
Department of Veterans Service and Veterans Service Board — Created; commissioner; officers; appointment; Senate confirmation; term; duties.

There is created within the state government a Department of Veterans Service. The Department of Veterans Service shall be administered by a commissioner of veterans service and a Veterans Service Board comprised of seven members appointed by the Governor. The commissioner of veterans service shall be the executive officer of the department and shall be charged with the administrative responsibilities of the department in conformity with the orders, rules, and regulations of the Veterans Service Board. The original appointments of the members of the board shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six, and seven years, respectively. Except in cases of vacancy, all terms and appointments of members of the Veterans Service Board after the original appointments shall be for seven years. No person shall be appointed to the Veterans Service Board and no person shall be eligible for the office of commissioner of veterans service except persons who have honorably served not less than three months in the armed services of the United States during a war in which the United States was engaged. All persons serving as members of the board or as commissioner under the terms of this article shall be residents of this state for a period of five years unless they were residents of this state at the time they volunteered, enlisted, or were inducted in the armed services of the United States. There shall be a chairman, vice-chairman, and secretary of the Veterans Service Board annually elected from among its own membership.

The members of the Veterans Service Board shall be confirmed by the Senate. All members of the board and the commissioner of veterans service shall hold office until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any appointment of a member of the board for a full term made when the Senate is not in session shall be effective only until the same is acted upon by the Senate.

As used in this article, the term “commissioner” shall mean the “commissioner of veterans service.”

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 65, § 5; Penal Code 1910, § 1469; Ga. L. 1923, p. 121, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1926, Ex. Sess., p. 53, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 9, 10; Code 1933, § 78-101; Ga. L. 1945, p. 315, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 2301; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2219, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 2.

Cross references.

Veterans Service Board, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. V, Para. I.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-2.
Powers; appointment of executive directors of veterans’ homes.

The Department of Veterans Service and the Veterans Service Board are authorized:

To apply for and to accept gifts, grants, and other contributions from the federal government or from any other governmental unit;

To use the funds received from the federal government or from any other governmental unit for the purposes authorized and directed by the federal government or such other governmental unit in making the funds available;

To accept and use gifts, grants, donations, and contributions of real estate, both vacant and improved, facilities, moneys, services, or other property from individuals, firms, corporations, organizations, and associations and from county and municipal corporations and their subdivisions, in addition to any funds appropriated by the state; and

To construct and operate hospitals, nursing homes, nursing care homes, assisted living communities, and personal care homes for the use and care of war veterans discharged under other than dishonorable conditions and to pay the cost of construction of the hospitals, nursing homes, nursing care homes, assisted living communities, and personal care homes. The term “cost of the construction” as used in this paragraph shall embrace the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, and easements acquired; the cost of all machinery and equipment; and the cost of engineering, architectural, and legal expenses and of plans and specifications and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the construction of any hospitals, nursing homes, nursing care homes, assisted living communities, and personal care homes. The term shall also include administrative expense and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the construction of any hospitals, nursing homes, nursing care homes, assisted living communities, and personal care homes; the placing of the same in operation; and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction and operation.

The executive director of the Georgia War Veterans Nursing Home in Augusta, Georgia, shall be appointed by the commissioner of veterans service upon the recommendation of the president of the Georgia Health Sciences University, subject to the approval of the Veterans Service Board.

The executive director of the Georgia State War Veterans’ Home in Milledgeville, Georgia, shall be appointed by the commissioner of veterans service upon the recommendation of the chief executive officer of the contractor operator of the home, subject to the approval of the Veterans Service Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 6; Ga. L. 1966, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 330, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1476, § 1/HB 438; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 38/SB 465; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 26/SB 178; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 38/HB 142.

Cross references.

Regulation and construction of hospitals and other health care facilities generally, T. 31, C. 7.

Authority of Department of Veterans Service to purchase ambulance for transporting veterans among hospitals and facilities, §

50-19-5

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a comma was added following “services” in paragraph (a)(3).

38-4-3.
Department of Veterans Service and Veterans Service Board — Duty to work consistently and diligently; educational programs; personal appearances; assistance in preparation of claims.

The Department of Veterans Service and all officers and employees thereof shall work consistently and diligently in all matters and particularly shall undertake to conduct an educational program for the information of veterans, their surviving spouses, and dependents, as to any and all rights accruing to such veterans under national, state, and local law. The commissioner of veterans service and the members of the board are directed to conduct educational programs by making personal appearances before veterans’ organizations, service clubs, fraternal groups, and other such organizations so as to acquaint the public generally with the work of the department and the rights and privileges of veterans.

The commissioner of veterans service, the board, and the department are authorized and directed to make available in any regions, locations, and areas throughout this state representatives of the department to assist veterans, surviving spouses, and dependents in the preparation and filing of claims for benefits and in acquainting them with all legal rights and privileges.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 12; Ga. L. 1981, p. 700, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-4.
Veterans Service Board — Vacancies.

Subject to confirmation by the Senate at the next session of the General Assembly, all vacancies on the board occasioned by death, resignation, or other cause shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the unexpired term.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 3.

38-4-5.
Veterans Service Board — Meetings; place; purpose; called.

The Veterans Service Board shall meet once each month and at the meetings shall give attention to all things and matters properly coming under the jurisdiction of the board. The board may meet in the offices of the Department of Veterans Service or at any other location within the state where such board is conducting business pertaining to veterans. The meetings provided for in this Code section shall be for stated regular periods but shall not exceed more than two days in any one session. Called meetings of the board may be held by the chairman thereof or by the commissioner of veterans service.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 584, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 371, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-6.
Veterans Service Board — Policy recommendations; appoint commissioner; discharge of commissioner; commissioner’s political activity.

The Veterans Service Board shall recommend to the commissioner matters of policy, procedure, and work projects.

The board shall select a commissioner of veterans service, who shall serve for a term of four years and who shall be chief executive and administrative official of the department and the board. The board, however, at any time for good and sufficient cause, properly shown, may dispense with the services of the commissioner after notice has been given to the commissioner and a hearing has been held before the board, at which hearing the commissioner shall be heard in person, by counsel, or both. No person who serves as commissioner shall be eligible, except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, to run as a candidate in any primary, special, or general election for any state or federal elective office nor to hold any such office, except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, during the time he serves as commissioner and for a period of 12 months after the date he ceases to serve as commissioner.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Code section, nothing contained in this Code section shall prevent the commissioner from being appointed to any such office nor disqualify the commissioner to run in any such elections to succeed himself in any office to which he might have been appointed nor to hold such office in the event he is elected thereto and qualifies under the requirements of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1908, p. 66, § 5; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 10; Code 1933, § 78-104; Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 664, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 38.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-7.
Commissioner of veterans service — Compensation; payment; duties.

Beginning July 1, 1999, the salary of the commissioner shall be set by the Governor and shall be paid in semimonthly installments. Such salary shall include any compensation received from the United States government and the amount of state funds paid shall be reduced by the amount of compensation received from the United States government.

The commissioner, as executive and administrative officer of the Department of Veterans Service and the board, shall be in charge of the administration of all matters pertaining to veterans’ affairs under this article and in conformity with rules and regulations of the board.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner:

To effectuate and carry out the laws of the state pertaining to veterans and to perform the duties required of him or her by law and by regulation of the board;

To furnish information to all veterans of all wars in which the United States has engaged as to their rights and benefits under federal legislation, state legislation, or local ordinances;

To assist all veterans, their dependents, and beneficiaries in the preparation and prosecution of claims before appropriate federal governmental departments;

To report any evidence of incompetency, dishonesty, or neglect of duty on the part of any employee of a governmental agency dealing with veterans’ affairs to the proper authority; and

Generally to do and perform all things for the promotion of, in the interest of, and for the protection of the veterans of this state as to their rights under all federal and state laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1906, p. 110, § 1; Ga. L. 1908, p. 66, § 4; Penal Code 1910, § 1471; Ga. L. 1919, p. 280, § 1; Ga. L. 1926, Ex. Sess., p. 53, §§ 1, 2, 4; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 9, 11; Code 1933, § 78-102; Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 664, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 160, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 165, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-8.
Commissioner of veterans service — Additional duties.

The commissioner of veterans service shall, in addition to the duties provided in this chapter:

Acquaint himself, his assistants, and employees with the laws, federal, state, and local, enacted for the benefit of members of the armed forces, veterans, their families and dependents, and make studies of and collect data and information as to the facilities and services available to them;

Cooperate with information or service agencies and organizations throughout the state in disseminating and furnishing counsel and assistance of benefit to residents of this state who are or have been members of the armed forces, their families, and dependents, which will show the availability of:

Educational training and retraining facilities;

Health, medical, rehabilitation, and housing services and facilities;

Employment and reemployment services;

Provisions of federal, state, and local laws affording financial rights, privileges, and benefits; and

Other matters of similar, related, or appropriate nature;

Assist veterans, their families, and dependents in the preparation, presentation, proof, and establishment of such claims, privileges, rights, and other benefits accruing to them under federal, state, and local laws; and

Cooperate with all national, state, and local governmental and private agencies securing or offering services or any benefits to veterans, their families, and dependents.

History.

Ga. L. 1923, p. 121, § 4; Ga. L. 1926, Ex. Sess., p. 53, § 3; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 10, 11; Code 1933, § 78-105; Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-9.
Commissioner of veterans service — Employment of personnel; preference to veterans, surviving spouses, and dependents; advise Governor, board, and General Assembly.

The commissioner of veterans service is authorized and directed to employ competent personnel to assist in the administration of the Department of Veterans Service. The commissioner shall give reasonable preference to veterans, their surviving spouses, and dependents in the matter of employment in the department; provided, however, that competency and efficiency shall not be sacrificed because of veteran affiliation, relationship, or service. It shall be the duty of the commissioner to advise the Governor, the Veterans Service Board, and the General Assembly as to needed veterans’ legislation. As executive officer, the commissioner shall have exclusive authority to employ personnel necessary to carry out the purposes of this article and shall define the duties of employees, assign their official stations, and fix their compensation subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 13; Code 1933, § 78-103; Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 8; Ga. L. 1981, p. 700, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-61/HB 642.

Cross references.

Fair employment practices in state hiring generally, § 45-19-20 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

38-4-10.
Commissioner of veterans service — Broad discretion in extending aid; utilize department to fullest.

The commissioner of veterans service shall exercise broad discretion in extending to veterans the aid and assistance provided by law and shall extend the services of the Department of Veterans Service so as to make available to all veterans the aid and services contemplated by law. In rendering the services required, the commissioner is authorized and empowered to advance consistently the interests of veterans of this state and to extend the Department of Veterans Service to its full limit of appropriations and funds provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 65, § 2; Penal Code 1910, § 1474; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 11; Code 1933, § 78-106; Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 10; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-11.
Commissioner of veterans service — Annual reports; content; recipients.

The commissioner of veterans service shall furnish to the Governor, the members of the General Assembly, the Veterans Service Board, veterans’ organizations, and the public generally an annual report with reference to claims presented on behalf of veterans of this state, concerning veterans aided under federal, state, or local legislation, and otherwise to report the activities and accomplishments of the Department of Veterans
Service. The commissioner of veterans service shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which he or she deems to be most effective and efficient.

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 65, § 3; Penal Code 1910, § 1475; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 11; Code 1933, § 78-107; Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 28/SB 49.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-12.
Commissioner of veterans service — Duty to maintain records.

Subject to other laws, the commissioner shall maintain full, adequate, and complete copies of all records pertaining to claims of veterans who file claims for veterans’ benefits through the Department of Veterans Service.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 319, § 9; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1096, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 11.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-13.
Women veterans’ office.

The commissioner of veterans service shall, in addition to the other duties provided in this chapter, maintain a women veterans’ office. Such office shall conduct outreach to women veterans for the purpose of improving awareness of eligibility for federal and state veterans’ benefits and services, conduct assessments of the specific needs of women veterans with respect to benefits and services, and review programs, research projects, and other initiatives designed to address or meet the specific needs of women veterans in this state. The women veterans’ office shall work with veterans court divisions as provided for in Code Section 15-1-17 to assist with recruiting and training women veterans to serve as mentors for veterans participating in these court divisions. In the annual report provided for under Code Section 38-4-11, the commissioner of veterans service shall specifically report on the office provided for under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 430, § 1/SB 108.

38-4-14.
Creation of Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc.; purpose; operation; reporting.

The Veterans Service Board shall have the power and authority to establish a nonprofit corporation to be designated as the Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., to qualify as a public foundation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code for the purposes described in this Code section. The nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this Code section shall be created pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 14, the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” and the Secretary of State shall be authorized to accept such filing.

The purpose of the Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., shall be to actively seek supplemental funds and in-kind goods, services, and property to promote Georgia’s state war veterans’ homes and veterans’ cemeteries and for any other purpose of the Veterans Service Board. Funds received by the foundation may be conveyed to the Department of Veterans Service or awarded through a competitive grant process administered by the Veterans Service Board.

The Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., shall be governed by a board of directors composed of seven persons, who shall not be the same individuals as the currently serving members of the Veterans Service Board, who shall be appointed by the commissioner of veterans service, subject to the approval of the Veterans Service Board. Persons appointed to the board of directors shall have honorably served not less than three months in the armed forces of the United States or two years in a reserve or National Guard component of the armed forces of the United States. The members of the board of directors shall serve for seven-year terms that shall be staggered such that one member completes a term each year. The members may succeed themselves on the board of directors one time and thereafter may be reappointed to additional terms following a three-year interval after completion of any second consecutive term.

The board of directors shall meet at least one time each year to conduct the business of the Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc. The board of directors shall annually elect from its membership a chairperson, a vice chairperson, a secretary, and a treasurer.

The board of directors shall appoint a chief executive officer, a chief operating officer, and a chief financial officer of the Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., from individuals who are employees of the Department of Veterans Service, excluding the commissioner of veterans service, who shall serve in these capacities without compensation but who shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses reasonably incurred from the Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., for performing their duties under this Code section.

The nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to the following provisions:

In accordance with the Constitution of Georgia, no governmental functions or regulatory powers shall be conducted by such nonprofit corporation;

Upon dissolution of such nonprofit corporation incorporated by the Veterans Service Board, any assets shall revert to the Veterans Service Board or to any successor to the Veterans Service Board or, failing such succession, to the State of Georgia;

To avoid the appearance of undue influence on regulatory functions by donors, no donations to such nonprofit corporation from private sources shall be used for salaries, benefits, or travel expenses of the Veterans Service Board;

Such nonprofit corporation shall be subject to all laws relating to open meetings and the inspection of public records;

The Veterans Service Board shall not be liable for the action or omission to act of such nonprofit corporation; provided, however, that as an administrative cost, such nonprofit corporation shall obtain and maintain errors and omissions liability coverage insurance in the amount of not less than $1 million; and

No debts, bonds, notes, or other obligations incurred by such nonprofit corporation shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia nor shall any act of such nonprofit corporation constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of the state; provided, however, that such nonprofit corporation shall not have the power to incur long-term or short-term indebtedness in connection with its authority under this Code section but may incur short-term credit obligations. No holder or holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state nor to enforce the payment thereof against the state.

The Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., shall prepare and make public an annual report identifying all donors to the Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., and the amount or property each donor donated, as well as all expenditures or other expenditures of money or property donated. Such report shall be provided to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Defense and Veterans Affairs and the Senate Veterans, Military and Homeland Security Committee, or their successors. The Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., shall also provide such persons with a copy of all filings with the federal Internal Revenue Service.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 186, § 1/HB 422; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 38/SB 52.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language and punctuation in subsection (b), paragraphs (c)(5) and (c)(6), and in subsection (d).

Cross references.

Cemeteries for veterans, §

38-4-70

et seq.